ga_IE/hyph_ga_IE.dic
ui6p5
uir5b4
uir1
uirbh6
uir3c4í
4uire
uirn6
6uir1s2
uirs3t
uir3t
uir2t4í
ui6s
uis3cr
ui6sc
uis5t
uit3é
u4it3s2
uí3b
uí3d
uí1g
uí5l6e
uí1m
uí1od
uío3dó
uí3oma
uí3on2n1
uí3ó
uí5teá6
uít4e
uí1t2h6
uí5t1í
ul1a
ul3á
ul3g4
ul3m4
ul3ó
ul5p6
ul6t5as
ul1t
ul4tr
um1a
umh1
ump1
un5a
un3á
un2c1a
un1c
un5e
u2ng1
un5ga3l
ung1a
un3g4ar
un5g2á
un3o
un1ó
un6sa.
un1s2
uns1a
un6s5aí
un3ú
unúd4
uó3t6
up1
4ur1a
urac2h3
ur6ag
ur3á
urca3m4
urc1a
ur1c2h4
ur3d6ú
urg5ói
ur5gón1
ur3i
ur6l3ál1
ur1l
ur3m4
6urn
ur3ó
ur3p
urscar6
ur1s2
urscart5
ur3t4
ur5u
ur3ú
6us.
usc5ai
usc3l
us3cr
ust5ac
ust5ail
ustai6
us4t3al
us3tó
us5t6u
ust5ún
ut5a
u6t5á
ut3e
ut2h1
uthan5t3
ut6ha
ut3ó
uz3a
ú5an
ú1á
ú4áil.
úb1
úba5dá
úbail4
úb4h
úb4h5a
úc1a
úca3b
úcas4t6
úcas1
úch1a
úc2h
ú1ch2á6
ú3che
ú3chí
úch5l
úch5óg1
ú5chr
úch2t4ó
ú4cht1
úc1l
úc1ó
úc1r
úc4rá
úd1
ú6dó
úd5r
úd5ú
ú1f
ú6fó
ú1g2h
úg1r
4úid
ú3id2ís
ú3ig1í
6úil1e
6úil1i
úil4t3
ú3imi
úin1t4
úirt3
úir1
úir2té
úi6sc3
úis3c4é
ú5it2ear
úit1ea
ú3it2eá.
úiteá6
úithi5s
úit2h1
ú6itín1
úit1í
úits3eá
ú4its2
úl1
ú3l4ag
ú4l5a1g2á
úlc4
ú5l6e
úl6éim
ú3l4i
6úl1r
úl1t4
ú3l4ua
úl5ú
úl3ú5l6
ú1mh
úmh3a4c
ú4mh1n2
ú4mh3ú
ún5a
ún3á
úng5á
ú2ng
úng5u
6ún1l
4ú1n2n1
ún3o
ún1ó
ún3t2
úp1
ú6p5a
ú3p4a5t6
ú5p6r
úr1
úra3b
úrabh4
úra3dá
úran6
úr6an1a
úr5ó
úrt4
ú3r6u
úr4ú
ú5rúi
ús4air1
ús1a
ús2á
ús5án1
úsc1
ú4sh3l
ú1sh2
ú3s4m2
ús3ó
ú3s4pé
ús1p
ú3sto
úst3ó
ús6t3r
ús3ú
út3a
ú6t1á
út2h1
ú3tho
út5óg1
út1r
ú5úi
ú5úl1
v1a
vac2h6
vac3s4
v4ad
vais5
vai6sc6
var5
vard6
3v4at
v1á
vean6
vean1t5
vear3
vearn6
3v4ei
veil5b
v4eil
v3eo
véar6
véis5
véist6
5v6ial
3v4in3i
v4ios5
vir5
virg6
v6íc
v3la
3vol4
v6ol1t3
vuít5
x3ac
x5ai
x5aí
8-8
8a8-8
8b8-8
8c8-8
8d8-8
8e8-8
8f8-8
8g8-8
8h8-8
8i8-8
8j8-8
8k8-8
8l8-8
8m8-8
8n8-8
8o8-8
8p8-8
8q8-8
8r8-8
8s8-8
8t8-8
8u8-8
8v8-8
8w8-8
8x8-8
8y8-8
8z8-8
8á8-8
8é8-8
8í8-8
8ó8-8
8ú8-8
-a8
-b8
-c8
-d8
-e8
-f8
-g8
-h8
-i8
-j8
-k8
-l8
-m8
-n8
-o8
-p8
-q8
-r8
-s8
-t8
-u8
-v8
-w8
-x8
-y8
-z8
-á8
-é8
-í8
-ó8
-ú8
8'8
8a8'8
8b8'8
8c8'8
8d8'8
8e8'8
8f8'8
8g8'8
8h8'8
8i8'8
8j8'8
8k8'8
8l8'8
8m8'8
8n8'8
8o8'8
8p8'8
8q8'8
8r8'8
8s8'8
8t8'8
8u8'8
8v8'8
8w8'8
8x8'8
8y8'8
8z8'8
8á8'8
8é8'8
8í8'8
8ó8'8
8ú8'8
'a8
'b8
'c8
'd8
'e8
'f8
'g8
'h8
'i8
'j8
'k8
'l8
'm8
'n8
'o8
'p8
'q8
'r8
's8
't8
'u8
'v8
'w8
'x8
'y8
'z8
'á8
'é8
'í8
'ó8
'ú8
